California statutes. Water Code
(f) In carrying out activities that may affect the probationary basin, state entities shall comply with an interim plan adopted by the board pursuant to this section unless otherwise directed or authorized by statute and the state entity shall indicate to the board in writing the authority for not complying with the interim plan.

(g) (1) After the board adopts an interim plan under this section, the board shall determine if a groundwater sustainability plan or an adjudication action is adequate to eliminate the condition of long-term overdraft or condition where groundwater extractions result in significant depletions of interconnected surface waters, upon petition of either of the following:

(A) A groundwater sustainability agency that has adopted a groundwater sustainability plan for the
 probationary basin or a portion thereof.

(B) A person authorized to file the petition by a judicial order or decree entered in an adjudication action in the probationary basin.

(2) The board shall act on a petition filed pursuant to paragraph (1) within 90 days after the petition is complete. If the board, in consultation with the department, determines that the groundwater sustainability plan or adjudication action is adequate, the board shall rescind the interim plan adopted by the board for the probationary basin, except as provided in paragraphs (3) and (4).

(3) Upon request of the petitioner, the board may amend an interim plan adopted under this section to eliminate portions of the interim plan, while allowing other portions of the interim plan to continue in effect.

(4) The board may decline to rescind an interim plan adopted pursuant to this section if the board determines that the petitioner has not provided adequate assurances that the groundwater sustainability plan or judicial order or decree will be implemented.

(5) This subdivision is not a limitation on the authority of the board to stay its proceedings under this section or to rescind or amend an interim plan adopted pursuant to this section based on the progress made by a groundwater sustainability agency or in an adjudication action, even if the board cannot make a determination of adequacy in accordance with paragraph (1).

(h) Before January 1, 2025, the state board shall not establish an interim plan under this section to remedy a condition
 where the groundwater extractions result in significant depletions of interconnected surface waters.

(i) The board’s authority to adopt an interim plan under this section does not alter the law establishing water rights priorities or any other authority of the board.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 347) by Stats. 2014, Ch. 348, Sec. 2.   (SB 1319)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10736.

(a) The board shall adopt or amend a determination or interim plan under Section 10735.2 or 10735.8 in accordance with procedures for quasi-legislative action.

(b) The board shall provide notice of a hearing described in subdivision (a) of Section 10735.2 or subdivision (a) of Section 10735.8 as follows:

(1) At least 90 days before the hearing, the board shall publish notice of the hearing on its Internet Web site.

(2) At least 90 days before the hearing, the board shall notify the department and each city, county, or city and county in which any part of the basin is
 situated.

(3) (A) For the purposes of this paragraph, the terms “board-designated local area” and “local agency” have the same meaning as defined in Section 5009.

(B) At least 60 days before the hearing, the board shall mail or send by electronic mail notice to all persons known to the board who extract or who propose to extract water from the basin, or who have made written or electronic mail requests to the board for special notice of hearing pursuant to this part. If any portion of the basin is within a board-designated local area, the records made available to the board by the local agency in accordance with paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 5009 shall include the names and addresses of persons and entities known to the local agency who extract water from the basin, and the board shall mail or send by electronic mail notice to those persons.

(c) The board shall provide notice of proceedings to amend or repeal a determination or plan under Section 10735.2 or 10735.8 as appropriate to the proceedings, taking into account the nature of the proposed revision and the person likely to be affected.

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3), Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to any action authorized pursuant to Section 10735.2 or 10735.8.

(2) The board may adopt a regulation in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 2 of the Government Code setting procedures for adopting a determination or plan.

(3) The board may adopt a regulation
 applying or interpreting this part pursuant to Section 1530 if the board determines that the emergency regulation is reasonably necessary for the allocation, administration, or collection of fees authorized pursuant to Section 1529.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 347, Sec. 19.   (AB 1739)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10736.2.

(a) Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code does not apply to either of the following:

(1) An action by the board
 pursuant to Section 10735.2.

(2) The adoption or amendment of an interim plan pursuant to this chapter.

(b) This section shall not be interpreted as exempting from Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) a project that would implement actions taken pursuant to an interim plan adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 60, Sec. 42.   (AB 203)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10736.4.

The extraction or use of water extracted in violation of an interim plan under this part shall not be relied upon as a basis for establishing the extraction or use of water to support a claim in an action or proceeding for determination of water rights.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 347, Sec. 19.   (AB 1739)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10736.6.

(a) The board may order a person that extracts or uses water from a basin that is subject to an investigation or proceeding under this chapter to prepare and submit to the board any technical or monitoring program reports related to that person’s or entity’s extraction or use of water as the board may specify. The costs incurred by the person in the preparation of those reports shall bear a reasonable relationship to the need for the report and the benefit to be obtained from the report. If the preparation of individual reports would result in a duplication of effort, or if the reports are necessary to evaluate the cumulative effect of several diversions or uses of water, the board may order any person subject to this subdivision to pay a reasonable share of the
 cost of preparing reports.

(b) (1) An order issued pursuant to this section shall be served by personal service or registered mail on the party to submit technical or monitoring program reports or to pay a share of the costs of preparing reports. Unless the board issues the order after a hearing, the order shall inform the party of the right to request a hearing within 30 days after the party has been served. If the party does not request a hearing within that 30-day period, the order shall take effect as issued. If the party requests a hearing within that 30-day period, the board may adopt a decision and order after conducting a hearing.

(2) In lieu of adopting an order directed at named persons in accordance with the procedures specified in paragraph (1), the board may adopt a regulation applicable to a category or class of persons in accordance with
 Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) Upon application of a person or upon its own motion, the board may review and revise an order issued or regulation adopted pursuant to this section in accordance with the procedures set forth in subdivision (b).

(d) In conducting an investigation or proceeding pursuant to this part, the board may inspect the property or facilities of a person to ascertain whether the purposes of this part are being met and to ascertain compliance with this part. The board may obtain an inspection warrant pursuant to the procedures set forth in Title 13 (commencing with Section 1822.50) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure for the purposes of an inspection pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 347, Sec. 19.   (AB 1739)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Determination of Rights to Groundwater [10737. - 10738.]

10737.

Except as provided in this chapter, an adjudication action to determine rights to groundwater in a basin shall be conducted in accordance with the Code of Civil Procedure, including pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 10 of Part 2 of that code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 676, Sec. 5.   (SB 226)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10737.2.

In an adjudication action for a basin required to have a groundwater sustainability plan under this part, the court shall manage the proceedings in a manner that minimizes interference with the timely completion and implementation of a groundwater sustainability plan, avoids redundancy and unnecessary costs in the development of technical information and a physical solution, and is consistent with the attainment of sustainable groundwater management within the timeframes established by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 676, Sec. 5.   (SB 226)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10737.3.

(a) (1) Unless otherwise ordered by the court, all monitoring and reporting required under all groundwater sustainability plans approved by the department, or submitted to and awaiting approval by the department, for a basin subject to an adjudication, or under any interim plan adopted by the board pursuant to Section 10735.8 for a basin subject to an adjudication, shall continue throughout the duration of the adjudication proceeding.

(2) All groundwater sustainability agencies required to submit reports to the department pursuant to Section 10728 regarding a basin subject to adjudication shall submit copies of the reports to the
 court during the duration of the adjudication proceeding. The court may order more frequent reporting than the reports required pursuant to Section 10728.

(3) The board shall submit to the court during the duration of the adjudication proceeding the information it receives from a person required to submit monitoring program reports to the board pursuant to Section 10736.6 regarding a basin subject to adjudication. If, during the proceeding, the board prepares a report regarding the subject basin containing information listed in Section 10728, the board shall submit a copy of that report to the court.

(b) (1) Throughout the duration of the adjudication proceeding, a party to the adjudication, and any other person extracting water from the basin, shall comply with the
 groundwater sustainability plan or plans for the subject basin or the interim plan for the subject basin adopted by the board pursuant to Section 10735.8, except as may be authorized by the court pursuant to Section 847 of the Code of Civil Procedure or other injunctive relief.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the terms of a groundwater sustainability plan, interim plan, or preliminary injunction shall not determine the rights in a final judgment of the comprehensive adjudication.

(c) Throughout the duration of the adjudication proceeding, a party to the adjudication, and any other person extracting water from the basin, shall not use new or increased groundwater use to establish a new claim of prescription during the proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 665, Sec. 4.   (AB 779)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10737.4.

(a) Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 10735) shall not apply to a judgment approved by the court pursuant to Section 850 of the Code of Civil Procedure if both of the following apply:

(1) A local agency or a party directed by the court to file the submission submits the judgment to the department for evaluation and assessment pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 10733.6.

(2) The department determines that the judgment satisfies the objectives of this part for the basin.

(b) A party or group of parties proposing a stipulated judgment pursuant
 to subdivision (d) of Section 850 of the Code of Civil Procedure may submit the proposed stipulated judgment to the department for evaluation and assessment pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 10733.6.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 10733.6, a judgment or proposed stipulated judgment pursuant to this section may be submitted to the department after January 1, 2017.

(d) A determination of the department on a submission pursuant to this section is subject to judicial review pursuant to Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Venue shall be in the court with jurisdiction over the adjudication action and the case shall be coordinated with the adjudication action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 665, Sec. 5.   (AB 779)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10737.6.

If the department determines that a judgment satisfies the objectives of this part in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10737.4, the department shall submit to the court the assessments and any recommended corrective actions that the department issues pursuant to Section 10733.8. The court, after notice and, if necessary, an evidentiary hearing, shall determine whether to amend the judgment pursuant to Section 852 of the Code of Civil Procedure to adopt the department’s recommended corrective actions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 676, Sec. 5.   (SB 226)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10737.8.

In addition to making any findings required by subdivision (a) of Section 850 of the Code of Civil Procedure or any other law, the court shall not approve entry of judgment in an adjudication action for a basin required to have a groundwater sustainability plan under this part unless the court finds that the judgment will not substantially impair the ability of a groundwater sustainability agency, the board, or the department to comply with this part and to achieve sustainable groundwater management.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 676, Sec. 5.   (SB 226)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10737.9.

(a) (1) Upon receiving notice that an adjudication has commenced in its basin, a groundwater sustainability agency shall host a public meeting to explain the adjudication process and the status of the adjudication to water users within the basin and the public.

A groundwater sustainability agency may invite the state board or the department to send a representative to the meeting in order to help explain the adjudication process.

(2) A recording or summary of the meeting shall be posted to a public internet website hosted by either the groundwater sustainability agency or the watermaster of the basin.

(3) For a basin that has multiple groundwater sustainability agencies, the groundwater sustainability agencies may hold a public meeting jointly or individually in furtherance of this subdivision. 

(b) This section shall only apply to basins in which a comprehensive adjudication has not been commenced by January 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 665, Sec. 6.   (AB 779)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10738.

The approval of a groundwater sustainability plan by the department shall not be construed to be a determination by or otherwise an opinion of the department that the allocation of groundwater pumping rights in the plan are consistent with groundwater rights law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 682, Sec. 1.   (SB 1372)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.75. GROUNDWATER MANAGEMENT [10750. - 10755.4.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [10750. - 10750.10.]

10750.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that groundwater is a valuable natural resource in California, and should be managed to ensure both its safe production and its quality. It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage local agencies to work cooperatively to manage groundwater resources within their jurisdictions.

(b) The Legislature also finds and declares that additional study of groundwater resources is necessary to better understand how to manage groundwater effectively to ensure the safe production, quality, and proper storage of groundwater in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 708, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10750.1.

(a) Beginning January 1, 2015, a new plan shall not be adopted and an existing plan shall not be renewed pursuant to this part, except as provided in subdivision (b). A plan adopted before January 1, 2015, shall remain in effect until a groundwater sustainability plan is adopted pursuant to Part 2.74 (commencing with Section 10720).

(b) This section does not apply to a low- or very low priority basin as categorized for the purposes of Part 2.74 (commencing with Section 10720).

(c) This section does not apply to a plan submitted as an alternative pursuant to Section 10733.6, unless the department has not determined that the alternative
 satisfies the objectives of Part 2.74 (commencing with Section 10720) on or before January 31, 2020, or the department later determines that the plan does not satisfy the objectives of that part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 346, Sec. 4.   (SB 1168)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10750.2.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), this part applies to all groundwater basins in the state.

(b) This part does not apply to any portion of a groundwater basin that is subject to groundwater management by a local agency or a watermaster pursuant to other provisions of law or a court order, judgment, or decree, unless the local agency or watermaster agrees to the application of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10750.4.

Nothing in this part requires a local agency overlying a groundwater basin to adopt or implement a groundwater management plan or groundwater management program pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10750.6.

Nothing in this part affects the authority of a local agency or a watermaster to manage groundwater pursuant to other provisions of law or a court order, judgment, or decree.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10750.7.

(a) A local agency may not manage groundwater pursuant to this part within the service area of another local agency, a water corporation regulated by the Public Utilities Commission, or a mutual water company without the agreement of that other entity.

(b) This section applies only to groundwater basins that are not critically overdrafted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10750.8.

(a) A local agency may not manage groundwater pursuant to this part within the service area of another local agency without the agreement of that other entity.

(b) This section applies only to groundwater basins that are critically overdrafted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10750.9.

(a) A local agency that commences procedures, prior to January 1, 1993, to adopt an ordinance or resolution to establish a program for the management of groundwater pursuant to Part 2.75 (commencing with Section 10750), as added by Chapter 903 of the Statutes of 1991, may proceed to adopt the ordinance or resolution pursuant to Part 2.75, and the completion of those procedures is deemed to meet the requirements of this part.

(b) A local agency that has adopted an ordinance or resolution pursuant to Part 2.75 (commencing with Section 10750), as added by Chapter 903 of the Statutes of 1991, may amend its groundwater management program by ordinance or resolution of the governing body of the local agency to include any of the plan components set forth in Section 10753.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 320, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10750.10.

This part is in addition to, and not a limitation on, the authority granted to a local agency pursuant to other provisions of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [10752. - 10752.]

10752.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this part:

(a) “Groundwater” means all water beneath the surface of the earth within the zone below the water table in which the soil is completely saturated with water, but does not include water that flows in known and definite channels.

(b) “Groundwater basin” means any basin or subbasin identified in the department’s Bulletin No. 118, dated September 1975, and any amendments to that bulletin, but does not include a basin in which the average well yield, excluding domestic wells that supply water to a single-unit dwelling, is less than 100 gallons
 per minute.

(c) “Groundwater extraction facility” means a device or method for the extraction of groundwater within a groundwater basin.

(d) “Groundwater management plan” or “plan” means a document that describes the activities intended to be included in a groundwater management program.

(e) “Groundwater management program” or “program” means a coordinated and ongoing activity undertaken for the benefit of a groundwater basin, or a portion of a groundwater basin, pursuant to a groundwater management plan adopted pursuant to this part.

(f) “Groundwater recharge” means the augmentation of groundwater, by natural or artificial means, with surface water or recycled water.

(g) “Local agency”
 means a local public agency that provides water service to all or a portion of its service area, and includes a joint powers authority formed by local public agencies that provide water service.

(h) “Person” has the same meaning as defined in Section 19.

(i) “Recharge area” means the area that supplies water to an aquifer in a groundwater basin and includes multiple wellhead protection areas.

(j) “Watermaster” means a watermaster appointed by a court or pursuant to other provisions of law.

(k) “Wellhead protection area” means the surface and subsurface area surrounding a water well or well field that supplies a public water system through which contaminants are reasonably likely to migrate toward the water well or well
 field.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 572, Sec. 1.   (AB 359)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Groundwater Management Plans [10753. - 10753.11.]

10753.

(a) Any local agency, whose service area includes a groundwater basin, or a portion of a groundwater basin, that is not subject to groundwater management pursuant to other provisions of law or a court order, judgment, or decree, may, by ordinance, or by resolution if the local agency is not authorized to act by ordinance, adopt and implement a groundwater management plan pursuant to this part within all or a portion of its service area.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a local public agency, other than an agency defined in subdivision (g) of Section 10752, that provides flood control, groundwater management, or groundwater replenishment, or a local agency formed pursuant to this code for the principal purpose of providing water service that has not yet provided
 that service, may exercise the authority of this part within a groundwater basin that is located within its boundaries within areas that are either of the following:

(1) Not served by a local agency.

(2) Served by a local agency whose governing body, by a majority vote, declines to exercise the authority of this part and enters into an agreement with the local public agency pursuant to Section 10750.7 or 10750.8.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (b), this chapter does not authorize a local agency to manage groundwater planning within the service area of another local agency.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in this part, the process for developing and adopting a revised groundwater management plan shall be the same as the process for developing and
 adopting a new groundwater management plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 185.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.1.

Nothing in this part, or in any groundwater management plan adopted pursuant to this part, affects surface water rights or the procedures under common law or local groundwater authority, or any provision of law other than this part that determines or grants surface water rights.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 603, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.2.

(a) Prior to adopting a resolution of intention to draft a groundwater management plan, a local agency shall hold a hearing, after publication of notice pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, on whether or not to adopt a resolution of intention to draft a groundwater management plan pursuant to this part for the purposes of implementing the plan and establishing a groundwater management program.

(b) At the conclusion of the hearing, the local agency may draft a resolution of intention to adopt a groundwater management plan pursuant to this part for the purposes of implementing the plan and establishing a groundwater management program.

(c) The local agency shall provide to the department a copy of a resolution of intention adopted pursuant to this section within 30 days of the date of adoption. The local agency shall also provide to the department contact information for the person in charge of drafting the groundwater management plan.

(d) The department shall post on its Internet Web site information it possesses regarding groundwater management plans being prepared or adopted pursuant to this part, including information provided by local agencies identified pursuant to this section, and monitoring entities identified pursuant to Sections 10928 and 10930.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 572, Sec. 3.   (AB 359)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.3.

(a) After the conclusion of the hearing, and if the local agency adopts a resolution of intention, the local agency shall publish the resolution of intention in the same manner that notice for the hearing held under Section 10753.2 was published.

(b) Upon written request, the local agency shall provide any interested person with a copy of the resolution of intention.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.4.

(a) The local agency shall prepare a groundwater management plan within two years of the date of the adoption of the resolution of intention.

(1) If the plan is not adopted within two years, the resolution of intention expires, and a plan shall not be adopted except pursuant to a new resolution of intention adopted in accordance with this chapter.

(2) If the plan is not adopted within two years, and the local agency was operating under a previously adopted groundwater management plan, that previous plan shall remain in effect.

(b) For the purposes of
 carrying out this part, the local agency shall make available to the public and the department a written statement describing the manner in which interested parties may participate in developing the groundwater management plan. The local agency may appoint, and consult with, a technical advisory committee consisting of interested parties for the purposes of carrying out this part.

(c) The local agency shall establish and maintain a list of persons interested in receiving notices regarding plan preparation, meeting announcements, and availability of draft plans, maps, and other relevant documents. Any person may request, in writing, to be placed on the list of interested persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 572, Sec. 4.   (AB 359)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.5.

(a) After a groundwater management plan is prepared, the local agency shall hold a second hearing to determine whether to adopt the plan. Notice of the hearing shall be given pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code. Notice shall also be provided to the department and to all persons on the list established and maintained pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 10753.4. The notice shall include a summary of the plan and shall state that copies of the plan and any maps that may be prepared pursuant to this part may be obtained for the cost of reproduction at the office of the local agency.

(b) At the second hearing, the local agency shall consider protests to the adoption of
 the plan. At any time prior to the conclusion of the second hearing, any landowner within the local agency may file a written protest or withdraw a protest previously filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 572, Sec. 5.   (AB 359)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.6.

(a) A written protest filed by a landowner shall include the landowner’s signature and a description of the land owned sufficient to identify the land. A public agency owning land is deemed to be a landowner for the purpose of making a written protest.

(b) The secretary of the local agency shall compare the names and property descriptions on the protest against the property ownership records of the county assessors.

(c) (1) A majority protest shall be determined to exist if the governing board of the local agency finds that the protests filed and not withdrawn prior to the conclusion of the second hearing represent more than 50 percent of the assessed value of the land within the local agency subject to groundwater management pursuant to this part.

(2) If the local agency determines that a majority protest exists, the groundwater plan may not be adopted and the local agency shall not consider adopting a plan for the area proposed to be included within the program for a period of one year after the date of the second hearing.

(3) If a majority protest has not been filed, the local agency, within 35 days after the conclusion of the second hearing, may adopt the groundwater management plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.7.

(a) For the purposes of qualifying as a groundwater management plan under this section, a plan shall contain the components that are set forth in this section. In addition to the requirements of a specific funding program, a local agency seeking state funds administered by the department for groundwater projects or groundwater quality projects, including projects that are part of an integrated regional water management program or plan, and excluding programs that are funded under Part 2.78 (commencing with Section 10795), shall do all of the following:

(1) Prepare and implement a groundwater management plan that includes basin management objectives for the groundwater basin that is
 subject to the plan. The plan shall include components relating to the monitoring and management of groundwater levels within the groundwater basin, groundwater quality degradation, inelastic land surface subsidence, changes in surface flow and surface water quality that directly affect groundwater levels or quality or are caused by groundwater pumping in the basin, and a description of how recharge areas identified in the plan substantially contribute to the replenishment of the groundwater basin.

(2) For purposes of implementing paragraph (1), the local agency shall prepare a plan to involve other agencies that enables the local agency to work cooperatively with other public entities whose service area or boundary overlies the groundwater basin.

(3) For purposes of implementing paragraph (1), the local agency shall prepare a map that details the area of the groundwater basin, as
 defined in the department’s Bulletin No. 118, and the area of the local agency, that will be subject to the plan, as well as the boundaries of other local agencies that overlie the basin in which the agency is developing a groundwater management plan.

(4) (A) Commencing January 1, 2013, for purposes of implementing paragraph (1), the groundwater management plan shall include a map identifying the recharge areas for the groundwater basin.

(B) The local agency shall provide the map required pursuant to subparagraph (A) to the appropriate local planning agencies after adoption of the groundwater management plan.

(C) Upon submitting a map pursuant to subparagraph (B), the local agency shall notify the department and all persons on the list established and maintained pursuant to subdivision (c) of
 Section 10753.4.

(D) For purposes of this paragraph, “map identifying the recharge areas” means a map that identifies, or maps that identify, the current recharge areas that substantially contribute to the replenishment of the groundwater basin.

 (5) The local agency shall adopt monitoring protocols that are designed to detect changes in groundwater levels, groundwater quality, inelastic surface subsidence for basins for which subsidence has been identified as a potential problem, and flow and quality of surface water that directly affect groundwater levels or quality or are caused by groundwater pumping in the basin. The monitoring protocols shall be designed to generate information that promotes efficient and effective groundwater management.

 (6) Local agencies that are located in areas outside the groundwater
 basins delineated on the latest edition of the department’s groundwater basin and subbasin map shall prepare groundwater management plans incorporating the components in this subdivision, and shall use geologic and hydrologic principles appropriate to those areas.

(b) (1) (A) A local agency may receive state funds administered by the department for groundwater projects or for other projects that directly affect groundwater levels or quality if it prepares and implements, participates in, or consents to be subject to, a groundwater management plan, a basinwide management plan, or other integrated regional water management program or plan that meets, or is in the process of meeting, the requirements of subdivision (a). A local agency with an existing groundwater management plan that meets the requirements of subdivision (a), or a local agency that completes an update of its plan to meet the requirements
 of subdivision (a) within one year of applying for funds, shall be given priority consideration for state funds administered by the department over local agencies that are in the process of developing a groundwater management plan. The department shall withhold funds from the project until the update of the groundwater management plan is complete.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a local agency that manages groundwater under any other provision of existing law that meets the requirements of subdivision (a), or that completes an update of its plan to meet the requirements of subdivision (a) within one year of applying for funding, shall be eligible for funding administered by the department. The department shall withhold funds from a project until the update of the groundwater management plan is complete.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a local agency that conforms to
 the requirements of an adjudication of water rights in the groundwater basin is in compliance with subdivision (a). For purposes of this subparagraph, an “adjudication” includes an adjudication under Section 2101, an administrative adjudication, and an adjudication in state or federal court.

(D) Subparagraphs (A) and (B) do not apply to proposals for funding under Part 2.78 (commencing with Section 10795), or to funds authorized or appropriated prior to September 1, 2002.

(E) A local agency may request state funds to map groundwater recharge areas pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) to the extent that the request for state funds is consistent with eligibility requirements that are applicable to the use of the requested funds.

(2) Upon the adoption of a groundwater management plan in accordance with this
 part, the local agency shall submit a copy of the plan to the department, in an electronic format, if practicable, approved by the department. The department shall make available to the public copies of the plan received pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 572, Sec. 6.   (AB 359)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.8.

A groundwater management plan may include components relating to all of the following:

(a) The control of saline water intrusion.

(b) Identification and management of wellhead protection areas and recharge areas.

(c) Regulation of the migration of contaminated groundwater.

(d) The administration of a well abandonment and well destruction program.

(e) Mitigation of conditions of overdraft.

(f) Replenishment of groundwater extracted by water producers.

(g) Monitoring of groundwater levels and storage.

(h) Facilitating conjunctive use operations.

(i) Identification of well construction policies.

(j) The construction and operation by the local agency of groundwater contamination cleanup, recharge, storage, conservation, water recycling, and extraction projects.

(k) The development of relationships with state and federal regulatory agencies.

(l) The review of land use plans and coordination with land use planning agencies to assess activities which create a reasonable risk of groundwater contamination.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 10753.7 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 603, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.9.

(a) A local agency shall adopt rules and regulations to implement and enforce a groundwater management plan adopted pursuant to this part.

(b) Nothing in this part shall be construed as authorizing the local agency to make a binding determination of the water rights of any person or entity.

(c) Nothing in this part shall be construed as authorizing the local agency to limit or suspend extractions unless the local agency has determined through study and investigation that groundwater replenishment programs or other alternative sources of water supply have proved insufficient or infeasible to lessen the demand for groundwater.
